Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1009
State agency or political subdivision; establish fees.

A state agency or political subdivision which owns or operates a recreational trail may establish and collect a user fee or a voluntary fee for the use of the trail as determined by the state agency or political subdivision. The fees shall be accounted for separately and shall be used for trail maintenance, operation, and acquisition.

Laws 1996, LB 296, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-1510;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 384.